Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-106.03
Board of Regents; insure compliance with sections; manner.

The Board of Regents shall inform the Director of Administrative Services that sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03 have been complied with for projects under its supervision before a warrant may be issued for payment.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 12.